Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.076] INFORMED CONSENT REQUIRED FOR SENSITIVE EXAMINATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "sensitive examination" means a pelvic, breast, urogenital, or rectal examination. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Informed consent required; exceptions. new text end new text begin A health professional, or a student or resident participating in a course of instruction, clinical training, or a residency program for a health profession, shall not perform a sensitive examination on an anesthetized or unconscious patient unless: new text end new text begin (1) the patient or the patient's legally authorized representative provided prior, written, informed consent to the sensitive examination, and the sensitive examination is necessary for preventive, diagnostic, or treatment purposes; new text end new text begin (2) the patient or the patient's legally authorized representative provided prior, written, informed consent to a surgical procedure or diagnostic examination, and the sensitive examination is within the scope of care ordered for that surgical procedure or diagnostic examination; new text end new text begin (3) the patient is unconscious and incapable of providing informed consent, and the sensitive examination is necessary for diagnostic or treatment purposes; or new text end new text begin (4) a court ordered a sensitive examination to be performed for purposes of collection of evidence. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalty; ground for disciplinary action. new text end new text begin A person who violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and is subject to disciplinary action by the health-related licensing board regulating the person. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end